app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/vi-vn-g2.ctb
#-index-name: Vietnamese, contracted
#-display-name: Vietnamese contracted braille
#
#+language: vi
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2
#+dots: 6
#+direction: forward
#+system: vietnam
#
#-copyright: Sao Mai Center for the Blind <www.saomaicenter.org/en>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
#  Copyright (C) 2018 by Sao Mai Center for the Blind <www.saomaicenter.org/en>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
# Created and maintained by: Dang Hoai Phuc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#
#-author: Dang Hoai Phúc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#-maintainer: Dang Hoai Phuc <danghoaiphuc@gmail.com>
#
#-updated: 2020-11-17
#
# Based on
# <https://www.saomaicenter.org/en/blog/accessible-formats/rules-and-guidelines-contracted-vietnamese-braille-grade-2>

include vi-charsdef.uti

# Braille indicators definition
numsign 3456
#letsign 6
# caps indicator
capsletter 46
begcapsword 456
endcapsword 46-13
lencapsphrase 5
begcapsphrase 46-46
begcaps 46-46
endcaps 46-13
# no letter sign before Vietnamese single-letter words
#noletsign áàảãạắằẳẵặấầẩẫậéèẻẽẹếềểễệíìỉĩịóòỏõọốồổỗộớờởỡợúùủũụứừửữựýỳỷỹỵ
#word a =
#word e =
#word ê =
#word i =
#word o =
#word ô =
#word ơ =
#word u =
#word ư =
#word y =
#noletsignbefore ',


# words contraction
match %[_^] biết %[_^] 12
match %[_^] bên %[_^] 23
match %[_^] bằng %[_^] 2356
match %[_^] bài %[_^] 56-12
match %[_^] bảo %[_^] 26-12
match %[_^] bỗng %[_^] 36-12
match %[_^] bỏ %[_^] 26-56
match %[_^] bắt %[_^] 35-12
match %[_^] báo %[_^] 35-23
match %[_^] bị %[_^] 6-12
match %[_^] bọn %[_^] 6-23
match %[_^] của %[_^] 14
match %[_^] các %[_^] 25
match %[_^] cái %[_^] 35-25
match %[_^] con %[_^] 36
match %[_^] cùng %[_^] 56-14
match %[_^] cả %[_^] 26-14
match %[_^] cửa %[_^] 26-25
match %[_^] cuộc %[_^] 6-14
match %[_^] còn %[_^] 56-25
match %[_^] càng %[_^] 56-36
match %[_^] cũng %[_^] 36-14
match %[_^] cũ %[_^] 36-25
match %[_^] có %[_^] 35-14
match %[_^] cứ %[_^] 35-36
match %[_^] cộng %[_^] 6-25
match %[_^] cho %[_^] 146
match %[_^] chỗ %[_^] 36-146
match %[_^] chờ %[_^] 56-146
match %[_^] chỉ %[_^] 26-146
match %[_^] chị %[_^] 6-146
match %[_^] chúng %[_^] 35-146
match %[_^] do %[_^] 145
match %[_^] d1 %[_^] 256
match %[_^] dài %[_^] 56-145
match %[_^] dầu %[_^] 56-256
match %[_^] dép %[_^] 35-145
match %[_^] dốc %[_^] 35-256
match %[_^] dẻo %[_^] 26-145
match %[_^] dở %[_^] 26-256
match %[_^] dọn %[_^] 6-145
match %[_^] dạng %[_^] 6-256
match %[_^] dẫn %[_^] 36-145
match %[_^] diễn %[_^] 36-256
match %[_^] đi %[_^] 2346
match %[_^] đầu %[_^] 56-2346
match %[_^] đến %[_^] 35-2346
match %[_^] được %[_^] 6-2346
match %[_^] đã %[_^] 36-2346
match %[_^] gần %[_^] 1245
match %[_^] gặp %[_^] 2356
match %[_^] gọi %[_^] 6-1245
match %[_^] gọn %[_^] 6-2356
match %[_^] góp %[_^] 35-1245
match %[_^] gói %[_^] 35-2356
match %[_^] gã %[_^] 36-1245
match %[_^] gõ %[_^] 36-2356
match %[_^] hơn %[_^] 125
match %[_^] hay %[_^] 236
match %[_^] hàng %[_^] 56-125
match %[_^] hồi %[_^] 56-236
match %[_^] hỏi %[_^] 26-125
match %[_^] hiểu %[_^] 26-236
match %[_^] hãy %[_^] 36-125
match %[_^] hãng %[_^] 36-236
match %[_^] hết %[_^] 35-125
match %[_^] hướng %[_^] 35-236
match %[_^] họ %[_^] 6-125
match %[_^] học %[_^] 6-236
match %[_^] gì %[_^] 245
match %[_^] giữa %[_^] 356
match %[_^] giúp %[_^] 35-245
match %[_^] gió %[_^] 35-356
match %[_^] già %[_^] 56-356
match %[_^] giờ %[_^] 56-245
match %[_^] giữ %[_^] 36-245
match %[_^] giã %[_^] 36-356
match %[_^] giọng %[_^] 6-245
match %[_^] kia %[_^] 13
match %[_^] kể %[_^] 26-13
match %[_^] kiểm %[_^] 26-46
match %[_^] kéo %[_^] 35-13
match %[_^] kết %[_^] 35-46
match %[_^] kiện %[_^] 6-13
match %[_^] khi %[_^] 12356
match %[_^] không %[_^] 26-135
match %[_^] khắp %[_^] 35-12356
match %[_^] khỏi %[_^] 26-12356
match %[_^] là %[_^] 123
match %[_^] làm %[_^] 56-123
match %[_^] lần %[_^] 56-456
match %[_^] lửa %[_^] 26-123
match %[_^] lẻ %[_^] 26-456
match %[_^] lẫn %[_^] 36-123
match %[_^] lẫm %[_^] 36-456
match %[_^] lúc %[_^] 35-123
match %[_^] lớn %[_^] 35-456
match %[_^] lại %[_^] 6-123
match %[_^] loại %[_^] 6-456
match %[_^] mà %[_^] 134
match %[_^] mình %[_^] 56-134
match %[_^] mở %[_^] 26-134
match %[_^] mỗi %[_^] 36-134
match %[_^] muốn %[_^] 35-134
match %[_^] mặt %[_^] 6-134
match %[_^] một %[_^] 24
match %[_^] nên %[_^] 1345
match %[_^] này %[_^] 56-1345
match %[_^] nổi %[_^] 26-1345
match %[_^] nữa %[_^] 36-1345
match %[_^] nếu %[_^] 35-1345
match %[_^] nội %[_^] 6-1345
match %[_^] người %[_^] 346
match %[_^] ngày %[_^] 56-346
match %[_^] ngủ %[_^] 26-346
match %[_^] nghĩ %[_^] 36-346
match %[_^] ngọn %[_^] 6-346
match %[_^] nhưng %[_^] 1246
match %[_^] như %[_^] 12346
match %[_^] nhiều %[_^] 56-1246
match %[_^] nhỏ %[_^] 26-1246
match %[_^] những %[_^] 36-1246
match %[_^] nhớ %[_^] 35-1246
match %[_^] nhận %[_^] 6-1246
match %[_^] phải %[_^] 124
match %[_^] phía %[_^] 235
match %[_^] phần %[_^] 56-124
match %[_^] phòng %[_^] 56-235
match %[_^] phấn %[_^] 35-124
match %[_^] phán %[_^] 35-235
match %[_^] phạm %[_^] 6-124
match %[_^] phận %[_^] 6-235
match %[_^] quyết %[_^] 12345
match %[_^] quyền %[_^] 56-12345
match %[_^] quả %[_^] 26-12345
match %[_^] quĩ %[_^] 36-12345
match %[_^] quá %[_^] 35-12345
match %[_^] rất %[_^] 1235
match %[_^] rồi %[_^] 56-1235
match %[_^] rõ %[_^] 36-1235
match %[_^] rút %[_^] 35-1235
match %[_^] rộng %[_^] 6-1235
match %[_^] sau %[_^] 234
match %[_^] sở %[_^] 26-234
match %[_^] sẽ %[_^] 36-234
match %[_^] sáng %[_^] 35-234
match %[_^] sự %[_^] 6-234
match %[_^] tôi %[_^] 2345
match %[_^] từ %[_^] 56-2345
match %[_^] tỉnh %[_^] 26-2345
match %[_^] tiếng %[_^] 35-2345
match %[_^] tại %[_^] 6-2345
match %[_^] thì %[_^] 2456
match %[_^] thẳng %[_^] 26-2456
match %[_^] thành %[_^] 56-2456
match %[_^] thấy %[_^] 35-2456
match %[_^] thật %[_^] 6-2456
match %[_^] trong %[_^] 23456
match %[_^] trên %[_^] 12456
match %[_^] trời %[_^] 56-23456
match %[_^] trẻ %[_^] 26-23456
match %[_^] trắng %[_^] 35-23456
match %[_^] trận %[_^] 6-23456
match %[_^] anh %[_^] 156
match %[_^] ấy %[_^] 16
match %[_^] ở %[_^] 345
match %[_^] và %[_^] 1236
match %[_^] về %[_^] 56-1236
match %[_^] vào %[_^] 3456
match %[_^] vẻ %[_^] 26-1236
match %[_^] vẫn %[_^] 36-1236
match %[_^] với %[_^] 35-1236
match %[_^] việc %[_^] 6-1236
match %[_^] xin %[_^] 1346
match %[_^] xuống %[_^] 35-1346
match %[_^] xã %[_^] 36-1346
match %[_^] xà %[_^] 56-1346
match %[_^] xuống %[_^] 35-1346

# include vi-vn-g1.ctb
#vowel groups
match %a iê %a 34
match %a iế %a 35-34
match %a iề %a 56-34
match %a iể %a 26-34
match %a iễ %a 36-34
match %a iệ %a 6-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] yê %a 34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] yế %a 35-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] yề %a 56-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] yể %a 26-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] yễ %a 36-34
match %[_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] yệ %a 6-34

word oá 35-135-1
word oà 56-135-1
word oả 26-135-1
word oã 36-135-1
word oạ 6-135-1

word oa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oa %[a_.^] 4
word óa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] óa %[a_.^] 35-4
word òa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] òa %[a_.^] 56-4
word ỏa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ỏa %[a_.^] 26-4
word õa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] õa %[a_.^] 36-4
word ọa =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ọa %[a_.^] 6-4
# processing the case of tone marks on letter a
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oá %[a_.^] 35-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oà %[a_.^] 56-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oả %[a_.^] 26-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oã %[a_.^] 36-4
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oạ %[a_.^] 6-4

match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oă %a 5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oắ %a 35-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oằ %a 56-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oẳ %a 26-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oẵ %a 36-5
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oặ %a 6-5

word oe =
word óe =
word òe =
word ỏe =
word õe =
word ọe =
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oe %[a_.^] 2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] óe %[_.^] 35-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] òe %[_.^] 56-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ỏe %[_.^] 26-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] õe %[_.^] 36-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ọe %[_.^] 6-2
# processing the tone marks placed on letter e
word oé 35-135-15
word oè 56-135-15
word oẻ 26-135-15
word oẽ 36-135-15
word oẹ 6-135-15
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oé %[a_.^] 35-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oè %[a_.^] 56-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oẻ %[a_.^] 26-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oẽ %[a_.^] 36-2
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] oẹ %[a_.^] 6-2

word uê =
word uế 35-136-126
word uề 56-136-126
word uể 26-136-126
word uễ 36-136-126
word uệ 6-136-126
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uê %[a_.^] 3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uế %[a_.^] 35-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uề %[a_.^] 56-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uể %[a_.^] 26-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uễ %[a_.^] 36-3
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uệ %[a_.^] 6-3

match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ươ %a 156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ướ %a 35-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ườ %a 56-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ưở %a 26-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ưỡ %a 36-156
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ượ %a 6-156

match %a uở %[_.^] 26-136-246
match %a uờ %[_.^] 56-136-246
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uô %a 12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uố %a 35-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uồ %a 56-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uổ %a 26-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uỗ %a 36-12346
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uộ %a 6-12346

match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uâ %a 25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uấ %a 35-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uầ %a 56-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uẩ %a 26-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uẫ %a 36-25
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uậ %a 6-25
